test/src/gt-norm-yamls/NA_C_NoExtra_biitoosijigan_gt-norm.yaml
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pos1Pl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhiminaaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhimiwaaan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhimiwaaag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhimiwaaing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Obv: biitoosijiganenhiminian
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Pl: biitoosijiganenhiminiag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+PosObv+Loc: biitoosijiganenhiminiing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 6, 7
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganensimibanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganensimibanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganensimibaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensim***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensim***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensim***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganenhimibanan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganenhimibanag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganenhimibaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhim***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhim***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhim***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 6
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: biitoosijiganensishinaaniban
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: biitoosijiganensishinaan***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pret: biitoosijiganensishiwaaiban
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: biitoosijiganensishiwaa***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pret: biitoosijiganensishiniiban
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: biitoosijiganensishini***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: biitoosijiganenhishinaaniban
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: biitoosijiganenhishinaan***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pret: biitoosijiganenhishiwaaiban
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: biitoosijiganenhishiwaa***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pret: biitoosijiganenhishiniiban
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: biitoosijiganenhishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 5, 7
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: biitoosijiganensishinaanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: biitoosijiganensishinaanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: biitoosijiganensishinaaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensishiwaaan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensishiwaaag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensishiwaaing
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Obv: biitoosijiganensishinian
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Pl: biitoosijiganensishiniag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+PosObv+Loc: biitoosijiganensishiniing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhishinaanan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhishinaanag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhishinaaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhishiwaaan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhishiwaaag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhishiwaaing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Obv: biitoosijiganenhishinian
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Pl: biitoosijiganenhishiniag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+PosObv+Loc: biitoosijiganenhishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4, 6, 7
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganensishibanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganensishibanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganensishibaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensish***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensish***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pej+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensish***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganenhishibanan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganenhishibanag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganenhishibaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhish***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhish***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pej+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 5, 6, 7
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganensinaanibanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganensinaanibanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganensinaanibaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensinaan***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensinaan***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensinaan***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganensiwaaibanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganensiwaaibanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+PosPl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganensiwaaibaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensiwaa***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganensiniibanan
     biitoosijigan+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganensiniibanag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+PosObv+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganensiniibaning
     biitoosijigan+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganensini***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganensini***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Dim+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganensini***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganenhinaanibanan
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganenhinaanibanag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganenhinaanibaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhinaan***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhinaan***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Con+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhinaan***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Con+PosPl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganenhiwaaibanan
     biitoosijigan+Con+PosPl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganenhiwaaibanag
     biitoosijigan+Con+PosPl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganenhiwaaibaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhiwaa***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Con+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Con+PosObv+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganenhiniibanan
     biitoosijigan+Con+PosObv+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganenhiniibanag
     biitoosijigan+Con+PosObv+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganenhiniibaning
     biitoosijigan+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganenhini***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganenhini***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Con+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganenhini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 6
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret: biitoosijiganimishinaaniban
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl: biitoosijiganimishinaan***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pret: biitoosijiganimishiwaaiban
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+VocPl: biitoosijiganimishiwaa***idig, idog***
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pret: biitoosijiganimishiniiban
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+VocPl: biitoosijiganimishini***idig, idog***
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 5, 7
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Obv: biitoosijiganimishinaanan
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pl: biitoosijiganimishinaanag
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl+Loc: biitoosijiganimishinaaning
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Obv: biitoosijiganimishiwaaan
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Pl: biitoosijiganimishiwaaag
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosPl+Loc: biitoosijiganimishiwaaing
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Obv: biitoosijiganimishinian
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Pl: biitoosijiganimishiniag
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+PosObv+Loc: biitoosijiganimishiniing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 4, 6, 7
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganimishibanan
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganimishibanag
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganimishibaning
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganimish***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganimish***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pej+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganimish***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 3, 5, 6, 7
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganiminaanibanan
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganiminaanibanag
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganiminaanibaning
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganiminaan***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganiminaan***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Pos+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganiminaan***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganimiwaaibanan
     biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganimiwaaibanag
     biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganimiwaaibaning
     biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganimiwaa***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganimiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Pos+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganimiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganiminiibanan
     biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganiminiibanag
     biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganiminiibaning
     biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganimini***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganimini***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Pos+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganimini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 5, 6, 7
     biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganishinaanibanan
     biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganishinaanibanag
     biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganishinaanibaning
     biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganishinaan***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganishinaan***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Pej+Pos1Pl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganishinaan***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganishiwaaibanan
     biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganishiwaaibanag
     biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganishiwaaibaning
     biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganishiwaa***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganishiwaa***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Pej+PosPl+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganishiwaa***idig, idog***ing
     biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Obv: biitoosijiganishiniibanan
     biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Pl: biitoosijiganishiniibanag
     biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+Pret+Loc: biitoosijiganishiniibaning
     biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Obv: biitoosijiganishini***idig, idog***an
     biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Pl: biitoosijiganishini***idig, idog***ag
     biitoosijigan+Pej+PosObv+VocPl+Loc: biitoosijiganishini***idig, idog***ing
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4, 5
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nibiitoosijiganensimishinaan
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nibiitoosijiganensimishiwaa
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nibiitoosijiganensimishini
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: nibiitoosijiganenhimishinaan
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosPl: nibiitoosijiganenhimishiwaa
     +Px1biitoosijigan+Con+Pos+Pej+PosObv: nibiitoosijiganenhimishini
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+Pos1Pl: gibiitoosijiganensimishinaan
     +Px2biitoosijigan+Dim+Pos+Pej+PosPl: gibiitoosijiganensimishiwaa
